Tennessee statutes. Title 38 Prevention And Detection Of Crime
Part 2

Tennessee Medical Examiner Advisory Council

38-7-201. Tennessee medical examiner advisory council — Creation — Members.

There is created the Tennessee medical examiner advisory council, referred to in this section as the “council.”

The council shall consist of seventeen (17) members, each of whom shall be a resident of this state. The membership of the council consists of:

Three (3) permanent ex officio voting members, consisting of:

The director of the Tennessee bureau of investigation, or the director's designee;

The speaker of the senate, or the speaker's designee; and

The speaker of the house of representatives, or the speaker's designee;

The following members appointed by the governor:

One (1) forensic pathologist from each of the five (5) regional forensic centers;

One (1) district attorney general;

One (1) district public defender;

Three (3) county medical examiners, one (1) from each grand division of Tennessee;

One (1) administrator from a non-hospital affiliated regional forensic center;

One (1) licensed funeral director; and

One (1) county mayor; and

The state chief medical examiner who shall serve as an ex officio voting member of the council.

All regular appointments to the council shall be for terms of three (3) years with a maximum of two (2) consecutive terms. Each member shall serve until a successor is appointed. Vacancies shall be filled by appointment of the governor for the remainder of an unexpired term.

Each member of the council shall receive reimbursement for travel expenses in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

If an appointed administrator of the council is absent from more than half of the meetings scheduled in any calendar year without good cause, then a vacancy is created. The vacancy shall be filled by the governor.

The council shall organize annually and shall meet to organize at the call of the prior year's chair. The council shall select the chair of the council. Meetings shall be held at least quarterly with additional meetings as frequently as may be required.

Meetings of the council shall permit members to electronically participate in the meetings.

The council shall have the power and duty to:

Review candidates and make a recommendation to the commissioner of health on the appointment of the chief medical examiner and deputy state medical examiners;

Assist the chief medical examiner in the development and updating of guidelines for death investigations and forensic autopsies in this state, to be promulgated as rules through the department of health;

Submit an annual report on the standards and guidelines of the medical examiners system to the chairs of the health committee of the house of representatives and the health and welfare committee of the senate;

Periodically review standards and guidelines promulgated by the department of health for the medical examiner system; and

Provide reports and recommendations to the commissioner on causes of death which may need public health intervention, funding issues, information technology needs, and any other issues as the council sees fit.

Acts 2008, ch. 969, § 23; 2017, ch. 444, § 3; 2018, ch. 571, § 1; 2019, ch. 353, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. The Tennessee medical examiner advisory council, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2025. See §§ 4-29-112, 4-29-246.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment divided former (a) into present (a)(1), introductory language of present (a)(2), (a)(2)(A), and (a)(2)(B); in present (a)(1), inserted “, referred to in this section as ‘the council’” at the end; in the present introductory language of (a)(2)(A), substituted “fifteen (15) members” for “nine (9) members” and added the second sentence; in present (a)(2)(A)(i), substituted “, who shall be a permanent ex officio voting member of the council;” for “shall be a permanent member of the council.”; in the present introductory language of (a)(2)(A)(ii), substituted the present language for “The governor shall appoint”; added present (a)(2)(A)(ii)(a); in present (a)(2)(A)(2)(b), substituted the present language for “one (1) district attorney general,”; in present (a)(2)(A)(2)(c), substituted the present language for “one (1) district public offender,”’ in present (a)(2)(A)(2)(d), substituted “Three” for “three” at the beginning; added present (a)(2)(A)(2)(e); in present (a)(2)(A)(2)(f), substituted the present language for “one (1) licensed funeral director, and one (1) public citizen to the council.”; inserted present (a)(2)(A)(2)(g); in present (a)(2)(A)(iii), substituted the present language for “The commissioner of health or the commissioner's designee shall serve as an ex-officio, nonvoting member of the council.”; in present (a)(2)(B), deleted “each,” following “three (3) years” and substituted “an” for “the” preceding “unexpired term”; added present (c); redesignated former (c) as (d) and rewrote the section, which formerly read, “The council shall organize annually and select a chair and other officers as needed. Meetings shall be held at least annually with additional meetings as frequently as may be required.”; added present (e); redesignated former (e) as (f); in present (f)(2), deleted “and” at the end; rewrote present (f)(3), which formerly read “Issue an annual report on death investigations in this state.”; and added (f)(4) and (f)(5).

The 2018 amendment added (a)(2)(A)(i)(b ).

The 2019 amendment substituted “seventeen (17) members” for “fifteen (15) members” in (a)(2)(A); and rewrote (a)(2)(A)(i), which read: “(i)(a ) The director of the Tennessee bureau of investigation, who shall be a permanent ex officio voting member of the council; or“(b ) An employee of the Tennessee bureau of investigation designated by the director;”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 444, § 4. July 1, 2017.

Acts 2018, ch. 571, § 2. March 16, 2018.

Acts 2019, ch. 353, § 3. July 1, 2019.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.